Utah statutes.
10-8-82.   Railroads -- Removal of unused tracks.

They may require the tracks of any railroad or street railway company to be taken up and removed which shall have been laid upon the streets or highways of the city, and which remain in the streets or highways contrary to the terms of the franchise of the company, or which are declared by the governing body a nuisance, or which such company has failed to operate for a period of nine months prior to the time when such nuisance shall be declared, and shall have the power to declare any of the acts specified in this section a nuisance.



No Change Since 1953

